apertium-kik.kik.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E G H I Ĩ J K L M N O R S T U Ũ W Y 
 a b c d e g h i ĩ j k l m n o r s t u ũ w y %-
 %>:0
 %{K%}:k ! %{K%}:g
 %{C%}:c 
 ! %{CC%}:0 ! %{C%}:0
 ! %{RRI%}:r %{RRI%}:0 %{IRI%}:i %{IRI%}:ĩ %{IRI%}:0
 %{N%}:n
 %{N2%}:0
 %{N3%}:0
 %{I%}:i ! 
 %{Ũ%}:ũ ! 
 %{Ĩ%}:ĩ ! 
 %{O%}:o
 %{U%}:u
 %{R%}:r ! %{RD%}:r %{RD%}:d
 %{T%}:t
 %{RAR%}:r 
 %{E%}:e 
 %{RRI%}:0
 %{IRI%}:i
 %{A%}:a !
 %{tĨ%}:ĩ ! true Ĩ
 %{yĨ%}:ĩ ! should become y when followed by vowel
 %{EE%}:e
 %{AA%}:a
 %{D%}:d
 %{II%}:i ! special i that triggers weird final vowel alternation
 %{BLOCK%}:0
 %{NULL%}:0
 %>:0
 ;

Sets

Vowels = A E Ä I Ĩ O Ö U Ü Ũ Y Ý 
        a e ä i ĩ o ö u ü ũ y ý ;

UnderVowels = %{A%} %{E%} %{I%} %{O%} %{U%} %{Ĩ%} %{Ũ%} %{tĨ%} ;

Rules

!!!!! VOWEL COALESCENCE RULES !!!!!

"Remove repeated i"
%{I%}:0 <=> _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{I%}: ;

"Remove repeated ĩ"
%{Ĩ%}:0 <=> V1: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ;
        except
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ũ%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{A%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{E%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{O%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: )(%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{U%}: ;
            %{I%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ĩ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ;
            where V1 in ( %{Ĩ%} %{IRI%} ) ;

"Remove a before certain vowels"
%{A%}:0 <=> _  [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]*   Vo: ;
        except
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ĩ%}: %{Ũ%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ĩ%}: %{A%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ĩ%}: %{E%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ĩ%}: %{O%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ĩ%}: %{U%}: ;
        where Vo in ( %{A%} %{E%} %{O%} %{Ĩ%} %{Ũ%} %{tĨ%} ) ;              

"Turn ĩ into e after a"
%{Ĩ%}:e <=> %{A%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]*  _ ;
        except
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ũ%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{A%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{E%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{O%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{U%}: ;

! "Turn ĩ into e after r"
! %{Ĩ%}:e <=> :r %>: _ ;


"Turn ũ into o after a"
%{Ũ%}:o <=> %{A%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ;
        except
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{A%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{O%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{AA%}: ;

"Turn ũ into u before o"
%{Ũ%}:u <=>  _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{O%}: ;
        except
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{A%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{AA%}: ;
            %{A%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ; 

"Turn ĩ into 0 after e"
%{Ĩ%}:0 <=> %{E%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _  ;
        except
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ũ%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{A%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{E%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{O%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{U%}: ;


!!!!! VOWEL CHANGE RULES !!!!!

! "Turn ũ into u before o" ! not working as intended because syllables
! %{Ũ%}:u <=> _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{O%}: ;
!        except
!            %{A%}: (%>: ) _ ;
!            _ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) %{A%}: ; 
!            _ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) %{O%}: ;

"Turn ĩ into i before u"
%{Ĩ%}:i <=> _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{U%}: ;
        except
            %>: (%{NULL%}: ) _ ;

!!!!! GLIDE FORMATION RULES !!!!!

"Turn ũ into w before certain vowels (?)" ! not working as intended because syllables. serious issue
%{Ũ%}:w <=> _  [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* V1: ;
        except
            %{A%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ;
        where V1 in ( %{A%} %{AA%} %{Ĩ%} %{E%} );


!"Turn ĩ into y syllable-intially before vowel"
! hard to work out because being syllable-initial is really complicated... unless word-initial of course.
!%{Ĩ%}:y <=> %>: _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* Vo: ;
!        where Vo in ( %{A%} %{E%} %{O%} %{U%} %{Ũ%} ) ;

"Turn ĩ into y syllable-intially before vowel"
%{yĨ%}:y <=> _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* Vo: ;
        where Vo in ( %{A%} %{E%} %{O%} %{U%} %{Ũ%} ) ;

!!!!! RULES SPECIFIC TO CERTAIN MORPHEMES !!!!! 

"Make ci- into i- except when before vowel"
%{C%}:0 <=> _  %{I%}: (%{NULL%}: ) %>: ;
        except
            _ %{I%}: %>: %{A%}: ;
            _ %{I%}: %>: %{I%}: ;
            _ %{I%}: %>: %{E%}: ;
            _ %{I%}: %>: %{O%}: ;
            _ %{I%}: %>: %{U%}: ;
            _ %{I%}: %>: %{Ũ%}: ;
            _ %{I%}: %>: %{Ĩ%}: ;
            %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ; ! this is actually wrong; the rule conflict should be prevented the other way. but excepting the cases where this rule applies is very very complicated.

"Convert prefix i- to rĩ- when vowel initial, part 1"
%{RRI%}:r <=> _ %{IRI%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* V1: ;
         where V1 in UnderVowels ;

"Convert prefix i- to rĩ when vowel initial, part 2"
%{IRI%}:ĩ <=> _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* V1: ; 
         where V1 in UnderVowels ;

"Turn FV into ĩ after i"
FV:ĩ <=> %{II%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ;
     where FV in ( %{EE%} %{AA%} ) ;

"Don't allow first place negative before consonant"
%{D%}:d /<= _ ;
     except
        _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ũ%}: ;
        _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{A%}: ;
        _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ĩ%}: ;

!!!!! NASAL PREFIX RULES !!!!!

"Convert nasal prefix to m"
%{N%}:m <=> _ %{N2%}: %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* :Co ;
        where Co in ( b ) ;

"Delete nasal prefix"
%{N%}:0 <=> _ %{N2%}: %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* :Na ;
        where Na in ( n m h ) ;

"Delete nasal prefix before th"
%{N%}:0 <=> _ %{N2%}: %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* :t :h ;

"Convert character after nasal prefix 1"
%{C%}:j <=> %{N%}: %{N2%}: %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ;

"Convert character after nasal prefix 2"
%{K%}:g <=> %{N%}: %{N2%}: %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ;

"Convert character after nasal prefix 3"
C1p:d <=> %{N%}: %{N2%}: %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ;
        where C1p in ( %{T%} %{R%} ) ;

"Convert nasal prefix before vowel"
%{N2%}:j <=> _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* Vo: ;
         except
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ũ%}: :m ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ĩ%}: :m ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{U%}: :m ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{O%}: :m ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{I%}: :m ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{E%}: :m ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{A%}: :m ;
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{tĨ%}: :m ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ũ%}: :n ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{Ĩ%}: :n ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{U%}: :n ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{O%}: :n ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{I%}: :n ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{E%}: :n ; 
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{A%}: :n ;
             _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{tĨ%}: :n ; 
         where Vo in UnderVowels ;

"Convert nasal prefix before vowel and nasal"
%{N2%}:y <=> _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* Vo: :Na ;
         where Vo in UnderVowels 
               Na in ( m n ) ;

"Convert final nasal prefix to ĩ"
%{N3%}:ĩ <=> _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{RAR%}: ;

"Convert second nasal prefix to d"
%{N2%}:d <=> _ %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* %{RAR%}: ;

!!!!! OTHER RULES !!!!!

"Convert k to g before certain consonants"
%{K%}:g <=> _ [ V1: ] [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* UC1: ;
        except 
            %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* _ ;
        where V1 in UnderVowels 
              UC1 in ( %{T%} %{C%} %{K%} ) ;

"Convert k to g before certain consonants part 2"
%{K%}:g <=> _  [ V1: ] [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: )  ]* :C1 ;
        except
            _ %{U%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{T%}: ;
            _ %{U%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{C%}: ;
            _ %{U%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{K%}: ;
            _ %{A%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{T%}: ;
            _ %{A%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{C%}: ;
            _ %{A%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{K%}: ;
            _ %{E%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{T%}: ;
            _ %{E%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{C%}: ;
            _ %{E%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{K%}: ;
            _ %{I%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{T%}: ;
            _ %{I%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{C%}: ;
            _ %{I%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{K%}: ;
            _ %{O%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{T%}: ;
            _ %{O%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{C%}: ;
            _ %{O%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{K%}: ;
            _ %{Ũ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{T%}: ;
            _ %{Ũ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{C%}: ;
            _ %{Ũ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{K%}: ;
            _ %{Ĩ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{T%}: ;
            _ %{Ĩ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{C%}: ;
            _ %{Ĩ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{K%}: ;
            _ %{tĨ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{T%}: ;
            _ %{tĨ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{C%}: ;
            _ %{tĨ%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{K%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{T%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{C%}: ;
            _ [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) (%{A%}: ) ]* %{K%}: ;
            %{N3%}: [ (%>: ) (%{NULL%}: ) ]* _ ; 
        where V1 in UnderVowels 
              C1 in ( t c k ) ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
